Alabama, session 2026rs, SB282.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 32-20-21, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§32-20-21
No certificate of title shall be issued for any of the
following:
(1) A manufactured home owned by the United States or
any agency thereof.
(2) A manufactured home owned by a manufacturer or
licensed manufactured home dealer and held for sale.
(3) A manufactured home owned by a nonresident of this
state and not located in this state.
(4) Manufactured homes designated 1999 and prior year
models, unless requested by a current owner pursuant to this
article.
(5) Modular homes.
(6) A manufactured home situated in this state and
permanently affixed to the real property on which it is placed
Page 1

permanently affixed to the real property on which it is placed
SB282 Enrolled
and for which the certificate of title or the manufacturer's
certificate of origin has been cancelled canceled pursuant to
subsection (b) of Section 32-20-20(b).
(7) Any other manufactured homes as prescribed by the
department."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on January
1, 2027.
Page 2

1, 2027.
SB282 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB282
Senate 24-Feb-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate, as amended.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 08-Apr-26




By: Senator Singleton
Page 3